Utah statutes.
58-28-601.   Animal abandonment.
(1)  Any animal which suffers abandonment for a period of five days may be
sold or placed in the custody of the nearest humane society or county dog
pound if the animal is not picked up within seven days after mailing a
notification, by certified mail, to the last known address of the person
placing the animal in the veterinarian's custody.  If no humane society or dog
pound is located in the county, the animal may be disposed of in a humane
manner.
(2)  A veterinarian who complies with this section is relieved from liability
for the disposal or sale of abandoned animals.
